California statutes. Labor Code
(c) Tanks of 112 cubic feet or less which are not subject to a pressure of more than 150 pounds per square inch.

(d) Air pressure tanks supplied with air by the same air compressor which supplies air for the brakes of any motor vehicle or streetcar, which units of transportation are operated by any person, firm, or corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Transportation or the California Highway Patrol.

(e) Tanks not subject to an internal or external pressure or more than 15 pounds per square inch, irrespective of size.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 518.)
-------------------------------------------

7625.

The following steam boilers are not subject to this part:

(a) Boilers under the jurisdiction or inspection of the United States Government, and all other boilers operated by employers not subject to Division 4 of this code.

(b) Boilers on which the pressure does not exceed 15 pounds per square inch. 

(c) Automobile boilers and boilers on road motor vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7626.

This part does not limit the authority of the division to prescribe or enforce general or special safety orders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration [7650. - 7655.]

7650.

Inspections required by this part shall be made either by qualified safety engineers employed by the division or by certified inspectors; provided, however, that shop inspections shall be made by the division, acting through its qualified safety engineers when request therefor is made by any manufacturer of tanks or boilers.

(a) As used in this chapter a “certified inspector” is one who is qualified to make inspections or examinations of boilers or tanks according to the rules under which the vessel is constructed, who has an unrevoked certificate of competency issued pursuant to this part, and who is employed by any one of the following:

(1) A county.

(2) A city.

(3) An insurer.

(4) An employer, for the purpose of inspecting only tanks and boilers under his jurisdiction.

(b) As used in this chapter a “qualified safety engineer” is one who is qualified to make inspections or examinations of boilers or tanks according to the rules under which the vessel is constructed. Such qualification is to be determined by a written examination prescribed by the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1530.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.

A certificate of competency may be obtained by application made to the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.

The division may determine by examination the competency of an applicant for a certificate of competency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, a certified inspector employed by an insurer or by an employer for the purpose of inspecting only tanks and boilers under his jurisdiction need not be a citizen or an elector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.

Upon good cause being shown therefor, the division may revoke a certificate of competency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7654.

Where serious conditions are found by certified inspectors that would jeopardize the life, limb, or safety of employees, the reports of inspection shall be made forthwith to the division by telegraph or telephone within twenty-four hours.

Within twenty-one days after each routine inspection, every certified inspector shall forward a report of his inspection, on prescribed forms, to the division. His certificate of competency may be suspended or revoked by the division for failure to comply with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1530.)
-------------------------------------------

7655.

The division shall prepare and adopt regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act provided for in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, designed to promote safety with respect to the installation and operation of vendor facilities for the storage and pumping of compressed or liquefied natural gas and liquefied petroleum gas into vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 119.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Operation of Tanks and Boilers [7680. - 7692.]

7680.

No tank or boiler shall be operated unless a permit for its operation has been issued by or in behalf of the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 467.)
-------------------------------------------

7681.

(a) The division shall inspect or cause to be inspected each installed tank at least every five years, except for any tank specified in subdivision (b).

(b) Any air pressure tank which contains 25 cubic feet or less and is not subject to pressure of more than 150 pounds per square inch and any liquefied petroleum gas tank used for storage, except a tank used for dispensing purposes as part of a dispensing unit, which contains 575 gallons or less shall be inspected or caused to be inspected by the division when the tank is initially placed into service if the tank is constructed, inspected and stamped in compliance with the American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) Code, or the design, material, and construction of the tank is approved by the division as equivalent to the ASME Code.

(c) “Dispensing unit,” as used in this section, means a stationary liquefied petroleum gas installation, other than a bulk plant, from which a product is dispensed, for final utilization, into mobile fuel tanks or portable cylinders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1216, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7682.

The division shall inspect or cause to be inspected each installed fired boiler internally and externally at least every year, except that the division may grant extensions to permit the interval between internal inspections to be increased to a maximum interval of 36 months where operating experience and design of the boiler has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the division that equivalent safety will be maintained.

For other classes of boilers, the division shall establish internal inspection intervals which will ensure the safety of people working in the vicinity of the boiler. In determining the intervals, the division shall consider such factors as the design and construction of the boilers and the conditions under which they operate.

External inspection shall be made of all boilers at the time of the internal inspection and at any other intervals as are deemed necessary by the division acting through qualified safety engineers and certified inspectors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 684, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7683.

(a) If a tank or boiler is found to be in a safe condition for operation, a permit shall be issued by or on behalf of the division for its operation. 

(b) In the case of a tank, the permit shall continue in effect for not longer than five years, except for any tank specified in subdivision (b) of Section 7681.

(c) In the case of a tank specified in subdivision (b) of Section 7681, the permit shall remain in effect as long as the tank is in compliance with applicable provisions of this part and regulations contained in Title 8 of the California Administrative Code. A new inspection and permit for operation shall be required whenever there is a change in ownership and permanent location of the tank or there is an alteration or change in the tank which affects the tank’s safety.

This subdivision applies to any permit in effect on the effective date of this subdivision as well as to any permit issued after such date. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an insurer is not liable for any permit issued prior to the effective date of this subdivision for any tank specified in subdivision (b) of Section 7681 for any period of time exceeding the period for which the last permit was issued.

(d) In the case of a boiler, the permit shall continue in effect for a period which is not longer than one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1279.)
-------------------------------------------

7684.

Each permit or a clear reproduced copy thereof shall be posted in a protective container in a conspicuous place on or near the tank or boiler covered by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 413, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7685.

The division may issue and renew temporary permits for not to exceed 30 days each, pending the making of replacements or repairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7686.

Upon good cause being shown therefor, and after notice and an opportunity to be heard, the division may revoke any permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7687.

If the inspection shows a tank or boiler to be in an unsafe or dangerous condition, the division may issue a preliminary order requiring such repairs or alterations to be made to it as are necessary to render it safe, and may order its use discontinued until the repairs or alterations are made or the dangerous or unsafe condition is remedied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7688.

Unless the preliminary order is complied with, a hearing before the division shall be allowed, upon request, at which the owner, operator, or other person in charge of the tank or boiler may appear and show cause why he should not comply with the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7689.

If it thereafter appears to the division that the tank or boiler is unsafe and that the requirements contained in the preliminary order should be complied with, or that other things should be done to make the tank or boiler safe, the division may order or confirm the withholding of the permit and may make such requirements as it deems proper for the repair or alteration of the tank or boiler, or the correction of the dangerous and unsafe conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7690.

The order may be reheard by the division, or reviewed by the courts, in the manner specified by this code for safety orders, and not otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7691.

If the operation of a tank or boiler constitutes a serious menace to the life or safety of any person employed about it, the division or any of its safety engineers or any person affected thereby, may apply to the superior court of the county in which the tank or boiler is situated for an injunction restraining its operation until the condition has been corrected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1530.)
-------------------------------------------

7692.

The certification of the division that no valid permit exists for the operation of a tank or boiler, and the affidavit of any safety engineer of the division that its operation constitutes a menace to the life or safety of any person employed about it, is sufficient proof to warrant the immediate granting of a temporary restraining order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1530.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Inspection Fees [7720. - 7728.]

7720.

The division shall not charge an inspection fee where an inspection is made by a certified inspector if the inspection has been made and reports have been submitted within the time limits specified in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 220.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7721.

(a) The division shall fix and collect fees for the shop, field, and resale inspection of tanks and boilers and for consultations, surveys, audits, and other activities required or related to national standards concerning the design or construction of boilers or pressure vessels or for evaluating fabricator’s plant facilities when these services are requested of the division by entities desiring these services. The division shall fix and collect the fees for the inspection of pressure vessels by a division safety engineer. The division may charge an additional fee for necessary subsequent inspections to determine if applicable safety orders have been complied with.

(b) The division
 shall charge a fee for processing a permit.

(c) The division shall fix and collect fees for field consultations regarding pressure vessels.

(d) Whenever a person owning or having the custody, management, or operation of a pressure vessel fails to pay the fees required under this chapter within 60 days after notification, he or she shall pay, in addition to the fees required under this chapter, a penalty fee equal to 100 percent of the fee.

(e) Any fees required pursuant to this section shall be in amounts sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs of the division for administering this part and shall be adopted as emergency regulations. These emergency regulations shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act
 provided for in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 221.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7722.

(a) The fees collected under this part shall be paid into the Pressure Vessel Account, which is hereby created, to be used for the administration of the division pressure vessel safety program.

(b) The division shall establish criteria upon which fee charges are based and prepare an annual report concerning revenues obtained and expenditures appropriated for the pressure vessel safety program. The division shall file the report with the Legislative Analyst, the Joint Legislative Audit Committee, and the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 222.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7725.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the meaning therein given them.

(a) “Small tank” shall mean any tank 1,200 gallons water capacity or less. 

(b) “Large tank” shall mean any tank of more than 1,200 gallons water capacity.

(c) “Shop inspection” shall mean the inspection and testing of tanks or boilers, manufactured, or in the process of manufacture, repair, or alteration, in the manufacturer’s shops, or at the jobsite, in accordance with the applicable rules of the respective codes under which they are manufactured.

(d) “Field inspection” shall mean the inspection and testing of installed tanks or boilers or both tanks and boilers, regardless of location.

(e) “Resale inspection” shall mean the inspection of boilers or tanks in the possession of a dealer or vendor at the request of a user who contemplates the purchase thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 467.)
-------------------------------------------

7726.

All inspection fees shall be paid before the issuance of a permit.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7723 by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1530.)
-------------------------------------------

7728.

Whenever an owner or user of any apparatus or equipment fails to pay the fees required under this chapter within 60 days after notification, said owner or user shall pay, in addition to the fees required under this chapter, a penalty fee equal to 100 percent of such fee. For the purposes of this section, the date of the invoice shall be considered the date of notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1191.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Offenses [7750. - 7750.]

7750.

Except during the time that a request for a permit remains unacted upon, every person owning or having the custody, management, or operation of a tank or boiler who operates it without a permit issued pursuant to this part is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The operation of a tank or boiler without a permit constitutes a separate offense for each day that it is so operated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Mismanagement of Steam Boilers [7770. - 7771.]

7770.

Every engineer or other person having charge of any steam-boiler, steam-engine, or other apparatus for generating or employing steam, used in any manufactory, railway, or other mechanical works, who wilfully, or from ignorance or from gross neglect, creates, or allows to be created, such an undue quantity of steam as to burst or break the boiler, engine or apparatus, or to cause any other accident whereby human life is endangered, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7771.

Every person having charge of any steam boiler, steam engine, or other apparatus for generating or employing steam, used in any manufactory, railroad, vessel, or other mechanical works, who willfully, or from ignorance or neglect, creates, or allows to be created, such an undue quantity of steam as to burst or break the boiler, engine, or apparatus, or to cause any other accident whereby the death of a human being is caused, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 223.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. VOLATILE FLAMMABLE LIQUIDS [7800. - 7803.]

7800.

“Volatile flammable liquids” as used in this part means any petroleum or liquid product of petroleum or natural gas having a flash point below 100 degrees Fahrenheit, and includes any petroleum or liquid product of petroleum or natural gas while at a temperature above its flash point. Flash points shall be as determined by means of the Tag Closed Tester, Designation D56-36 American Society for Testing Materials, or the Pensky-Martens Closed Tester, Designation D93-42 American Society for Testing Materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 922.)
-------------------------------------------

7801.

“Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board” as used in this part means the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health, Department of Industrial Relations, State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

7802.

The Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board shall adopt general orders pursuant to Section 6500, to make effective the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

7803.

Every employer who engages in any business requiring any employee to handle or use any volatile flammable liquid or to work in the close proximity of any such liquid in sufficient quantity and under conditions affording opportunity for the person or clothing becoming ignited shall provide adequate means of extinguishment whereby such employee may extinguish flames on his person or clothing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 922.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7.5. REFINERY AND CHEMICAL PLANTS [7850. - 7873.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [7850. - 7853.]

7850.

This part shall be known and cited as the California Refinery and Chemical Plant Worker Safety Act of 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7851.

The Legislature finds and declares that because of the potentially hazardous nature of handling large quantities of chemicals and recent disasters involving chemical handling in other states, a greater state effort is required to ensure worker safety. The Legislature also recognizes that a key element for ensuring workplace safety is adequate employee training. The potential consequences of explosions, fires, and releases of dangerous chemicals may be catastrophic. Thus, immediate and comprehensive government action must be taken to ensure that workers in refineries, chemical plants, and other related facilities are thoroughly trained and that adequate process safety management practices are
 implemented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 978, Sec. 1.   (AB 3258)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this part, that the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board and the Division of Occupational Safety and Health promote worker safety through implementation of training and process safety management practices in refineries and chemical plants and other facilities deemed appropriate.

(b) To the maximum extent practicable, the board and the division shall minimize duplications with other state statutory programs and business reporting requirements when developing standards pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7855).

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this part, that in the interest of promoting worker safety, standards be adopted by March 31, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 978, Sec. 2.   (AB 3258)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7853.

For the purposes of this part:

(a) “Biofuel” means biodiesel, renewable diesel, renewable aviation fuel, or other liquid products derived from alternative feedstock if the alternative feedstock is refined through coprocessing or at a refinery that was converted from petroleum to alternative feedstock.

(b) “Process safety management” means the application of management programs, which are not limited to engineering guidelines, when dealing with the risks associated with handling or working near hazardous chemicals. Process safety management is intended to prevent or minimize the consequences of catastrophic releases
 of acutely hazardous, flammable, or explosive chemicals.

(c) “Refinery” means an establishment that produces gasoline, diesel fuel, aviation fuel,
 or biofuel through the processing of crude oil or alternative feedstock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 978, Sec. 3.   (AB 3258)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Process Safety Management Standards [7855. - 7873.]

7855.

The purpose of this chapter is to prevent or minimize the consequences of catastrophic releases of toxic, flammable, or explosive chemicals. The establishment of process safety management standards are intended to eliminate, to a substantial degree, the risks to which workers are exposed in refineries, chemical plants, and other related manufacturing facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 978, Sec. 4.   (AB 3258)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7856.

(a) By March 31, 2014, the board shall adopt process safety management standards for refineries, chemical plants, and other manufacturing facilities, as specified in Codes 28 (Chemical and Allied Products) and 29 (Petroleum Refining and Related Industries) of the Manual of Standard Industrial Classification Codes, published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 Edition, that handle regulated substances as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 25532 of the Health and Safety Code and pose a significant likelihood of accident risk, as determined by the board. Alternately, upon making a finding that there is a significant likelihood of risk to employees at a facility not included in Codes 28 and 29
 resulting from the presence of acutely hazardous materials or explosives as identified in Part 172 (commencing with Section 172.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the board may require that these facilities be subject to the jurisdiction of the standards provided for in this section. When adopting these standards, the board shall give priority to facilities and areas of facilities where the potential is greatest for preventing severe or catastrophic accidents because of the size or nature of the process or business. The standards adopted pursuant to this section shall require that injury prevention programs of employers subject to this part and implemented pursuant to Section 6401.7 include the requirements of this part.

(b) By January 1, 2026, the division shall propose, and the board shall consider for adoption, regulations that implement this
 part for refineries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 978, Sec. 5.   (AB 3258)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7857.

The process safety management standards shall include provisions dealing with the items prescribed by Sections 7858 to 7868, inclusive, of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7858.

The employer shall develop and maintain a compilation of written safety information to enable the employer and the employees operating the process to identify and understand the hazards posed by processes involving acutely hazardous and flammable material. The employer shall provide for employee participation in this process. This safety information shall be communicated to employees involved in the processes, and shall include information pertaining to hazards of acutely hazardous and flammable materials used in the process, information pertaining to the technology of the process, and information pertaining to the equipment in the process. A copy of this information and communication shall be accessible to all workers who perform any duties in or near the process area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7859.

The employer shall perform a hazard analysis for identifying, evaluating, and controlling hazards involved in the process. The employer shall provide for the participation of knowledgeable operating employees in these analyses. The final report containing the results of the hazardous analysis for each process shall be available, in the respective work area, for review by any person working in that area. Upon request of any worker or any labor union representative of any worker in the area, the employer shall provide or make available a copy of any risk management prevention program prepared for that facility pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25531) of Chapter 6.95 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code. The board, when adopting a standard or standards pertaining to this section, may authorize employers to submit risk management prevention programs prepared pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25531) of Chapter 6.95 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code to satisfy related requirements in whole or in part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7860.

(a) The employer shall develop and implement written operating procedures that provide clear instructions for safely conducting activities involved in each process consistent with the process safety information.

(b) A copy of the operating procedures shall be readily accessible to employees or to any other person who works in or near the process area.

(c) The operating procedures shall be reviewed as often as necessary to assure that they reflect current operating practice, including changes that result from changes in process chemicals, technology, and equipment, and changes to facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7861.

(a) Each employee whose primary duties include the operating or maintenance of a process, and each employee prior to assuming operations and maintenance duties in a newly assigned process, shall be trained in an overview of the process and in the operating procedures as specified in Section 7860. The training shall include emphasis on the specific safety and health hazards, procedures, and safe practices applicable to the employee’s job tasks.

(b) Refresher and supplemental training shall be provided to each operating or maintenance employee, or both, and other worker necessary to ensure safe operation of the facility and on a recurring regular schedule as determined adequate by the board.

(c) The employer shall ensure that each worker necessary to ensure safe operation of the facility has received and successfully completed training as specified by this section. The employer, after the initial or refresher training shall prepare a certification record which contains the identity of the employee, the date of training, and the signature of the person conducting the training. Testing procedures shall be established by each employer to ensure competency in job skill levels and safe and healthy work practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7862.

(a) The employer shall inform contractors performing work on, or near, a process of the known potential fire, explosion, or toxic release hazards related to the contractor’s work and the process, and require that contractors have trained their employees to a level adequate to safely perform their job. The employer shall also inform contractors of any applicable safety rules of the facility, and assure that the contractors have so informed their employees.

(b) The employer shall explain to contractors the applicable provisions of the emergency action plan required by Section 7868.

(c) Contractors shall assure that their employees have received training to safely perform their jobs and that these employees will adhere to all applicable work practices and safety rules of the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7863.

The employer shall perform a prestartup safety review for new facilities and for modified facilities for which the modification necessitates a change in the process safety information. These reviews shall include knowledgeable operating employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7864.

The employer shall establish and implement written procedures and inspection and testing programs to maintain the ongoing integrity of process equipment. These programs shall include a process for allowing employees to identify and report potentially faulty or unsafe equipment, and to record their observations and suggestions in writing. The employer shall respond regarding the disposition of the employee’s concerns contained in the reports in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7865.

The employer shall develop and implement a written procedure governing the issuance of “hot work” permits. “Hot work” includes electric or gas welding, cutting, brazing, or similar flame- or spark-producing operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7866.

The employer shall establish and implement written procedures to manage changes, except for replacements in kind, to process chemicals, technology, and equipment, and to make changes to facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7867.

The employer shall establish a written procedure for investigating every incident which results in, or, as determined by board criteria, could reasonably have resulted in, a major accident in the workplace. The procedure shall, at a minimum, require that a written report be prepared and be provided to all employees whose work assignments are within the facility where the incident occurred at the time the incident occurred and shall also include establishing a method for dealing with findings and recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7868.

The employer shall establish and implement an emergency action plan. The employer may use the business plan for emergency response submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25503.5 and subdivision (b) of Section 25505 of the Health and Safety Code if it meets the standards adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1632, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7870.

Notwithstanding the availability of federal funds to carry out the purposes of this part, the division shall annually fix and collect reasonable fees for consultation, inspection, adoption of standards, and other duties conducted pursuant to this part. The fees shall be adopted by March 31, 2014. All revenue collected from these fees shall be deposited into the Occupational Safety and Health Fund. The fees shall be sufficient to support, at a minimum, the annual cost of 15 positions. The expenditure of these funds shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or other measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 44.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7872.

(a) As used in this section and in Section 7873, “turnaround” means a planned, periodic shutdown, total or partial, of a refinery process unit or plant to perform maintenance, overhaul, and repair operations and to inspect, test, and replace process materials and equipment. “Turnaround” does not include unplanned shutdowns that occur due to emergencies or other unexpected maintenance matters in a process unit or plant. “Turnaround” also does not include routine maintenance, where routine maintenance consists of regular, periodic maintenance on one or more pieces of equipment at a refinery process unit or plant that may require shutdown of that equipment.

(b) Every September 15,
 every refinery employer shall submit to the division a full schedule of planned turnarounds for all affected units for the following calendar year.

(c) At the request of the division, at least 60 days prior to the shutdown of a process unit or plant as part of a planned turnaround, a refinery employer shall provide access onsite and allow the division to review the following documentation for the process unit or plant scheduled to be shut down for that turnaround:

(1) All corrosion reports and risk-based inspection reports generated since the last turnaround.

(2) Process hazard analyses generated since the last turnaround.

(3) Boiler permit schedules.

(4) All management of change records related to repairs, design modifications, and process changes implemented since the last turnaround or scheduled to be completed in the planned turnaround referenced in this subdivision and identified in subdivision (b).

(5) Work orders scheduled to be completed in the planned turnaround referenced in this subdivision and identified in subdivision (b).

(6) All temporary repairs made since the last turnaround, including, but not limited to, clamps and encapsulations. As used in this section, “temporary repairs” means repairs made to piping systems in order to restore sufficient integrity to continue safe operation until permanent repairs can be scheduled.

(7) Notification and description of all repairs, design modifications, or process changes described in a corrosion report, risk-based inspection report, process hazard analysis, boiler permit schedule, management of change record, work order, or other document listed in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, that the refinery employer has deferred to a subsequent operational period or turnaround.

(d) The division may request additional information as necessary to perform its responsibilities in this part pursuant to Section 6314.

(e) At the request of the division, at least 30 days before the shutdown of a process unit or plant as part of a planned turnaround, a refinery employer shall provide access onsite and allow the
 division to review any changes to the information or documents reviewed by the division pursuant to subdivision (c) and relevant supporting documents.

(f) At the division’s request, a refinery employer shall provide the division with physical copies, or, at the division’s discretion, electronic copies if available, of the documentation reviewed by the division pursuant to subdivisions (c), (d), and (e).

(g) By agreement with a refinery employer, the division may modify the reporting period as to any individual item of information.

(h) This section is not intended to limit or increase the division’s authority in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) to prohibit use of a place of employment, machine,
 device, apparatus, or equipment or any part thereof that constitutes an imminent hazard to employees.

(i) The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of this section is to improve the ability of the state to conduct inspections of refining operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 978, Sec. 6.   (AB 3258)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7873.

(a) As used in this section, “trade secret” means a trade secret as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 7924.510 of the Government Code or Section 1061 of the Evidence Code, and shall include the schedule submitted to the division pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7872 of this code, and the scheduling, duration, layout, configuration, and type of work to be performed during a turnaround. Upon completion of a turnaround, the scheduling and duration of that turnaround shall no longer be considered a trade secret. The wages, hours, benefits, job classifications, and training standards for employees performing work for refinery employers is not a trade secret.

(b) (1) If a refinery employer believes that information submitted to the division pursuant to Section 7872 may involve the release of a trade secret, the refinery employer shall nevertheless provide this information to the division. The refinery employer, at the time of submission, may identify all or a portion of the information submitted to the division as trade secret and, to the extent feasible, segregate records designated as trade secret from the other records.

(2) Subject to subdivisions (c), (d), and (g), the division shall not release to the public any information designated as a trade secret by the refinery employer pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) (1) Upon the receipt of a request for the release of information to the public that includes
 information that the refinery employer has notified the division is a trade secret pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the division shall notify the refinery employer in writing of the request by certified mail, return receipt requested.

(2) The division shall release the requested information to the public, unless both of the following occur:

(A) Within 30 days of receipt of the notice of the request for information, the refinery employer files an action in an appropriate court for a declaratory judgment that the information is subject to protection as a trade secret, as defined in subdivision (a), and promptly notifies the division of that action.
